Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.56, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Optometry defined. (a) Any person shall be deemed to be practicing optometry within the meaning of sections 148.52 to 148.62 who shall in any way: (1) advertise as an optometrist; (2) employ any means, including the use of autorefractors or other automated testing devices, for the measurement of the powers of vision or the adaptation of lenses or prisms for the aid thereof; (3) possess testing appliances for the purpose of the measurement of the powers of vision; (4) diagnose any disease, optical deficiency or deformity, or visual or muscular anomaly of the visual system consisting of the human eye and its accessory or subordinate anatomical parts; (5) prescribe lenses, including plano or cosmetic contact lenses, or prisms for the correction or the relief of same; (6) employ or prescribe ocular exercises, orthoptics, or habilitative and rehabilitative therapeutic vision care; or (7) prescribe or administer legend drugs to aid in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, prevention, treatment, or management of disease, deficiency, deformity, or abnormality of the human eye and adnexa included in the curricula of accredited schools or colleges of optometry, and as limited by Minnesota statute and adopted rules by the Board of Optometry, or who holds oneself out as being able to do so. (b) In the course of treatment, nothing in this section shall allow: (1) legend drugs to be administered intravenouslydeleted text begin , intramuscularly, or by injection, except for treatment of anaphylaxisdeleted text end new text begin or by sub-Tenon, retrobulbar, or intravitreal injectionnew text end ; (2) invasive surgery including, but not limited to, surgery using lasers; (3) Schedule II and III oral legend drugs deleted text begin and oral steroidsdeleted text end to be administered or prescribed;new text begin ornew text end (4) oral deleted text begin antivirals to be prescribed or administered for more than ten days; ordeleted text end new text begin steroids to be administered or prescribed for more than 14 days without consultation with a physician.new text end deleted text begin (5) oral carbonic anhydrase inhibitors to be prescribed or administered for more than seven days. deleted text end